New Jersey, session 222, A2603.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Each school district shall develop and implement a policy requiring all teachers, school administrators, and other school employees to have a school identification card which is clearly visible at all times while the employee is in a school building when school is in session. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall develop guidelines concerning the information to be included on the identification card required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The information shall include, but need not be limited to, the employees name, position or affiliation with the school or school district, an up-to-date photograph, and the current school year. The policy shall ensure that the school identification card of any teacher, school administrator, or other school employee who resigns or is terminated from employment with the school district is returned to the district. 2.    a.  Each school district shall develop and implement a policy requiring all students to have a school identification card which is clearly visible at all times while the student is in a school building when school is in session. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall develop guidelines concerning the information to be included on the identification card required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The information shall include, but need not be limited to, the students name, an up-to-date photograph, and the current school year. c.     The commissioner shall examine whether the student identification cards should be used for school purposes in addition to identification, such as purchasing meals, access to library materials, admittance to school-sponsored activities, and boarding school buses. The recommendations developed pursuant to this section shall provide that the identification card of any student who is no longer enrolled in the district is returned to the district. 3.    a.  Each school district shall develop and implement a policy requiring any visitor to the school to have a visitor pass, and that screening procedures are utilized to monitor visitor entry and access to school facilities. b.    The commissioner shall develop guidelines concerning the visitor policy required to be developed by school districts pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The guidelines shall include a process for the district to determine if the individual is listed on the Internet registry maintained by the Superintendent of State Police pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2001, c.167 (C.2C:7-13). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.